Wyoming, session 2025, HB0158.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is appropriated two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office. These funds shall be used only
for the purpose of the planning, design, purchase and
installation of an electronic voting system in the chambers
HB0158

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0353
of the house of representatives and senate chambers at the
Wyoming state capitol building. The electronic voting
systems required by this act shall:

(i) Include the placement of devices located at
each legislator's desk or in other locations on the floor
of the chambers that allow each legislator to cast a vote
by electronic means and that allow vote tabulation by
electronic means;

(ii) Allow the display of votes cast on the
electronic voting systems in the chambers of the house
where the vote was cast and on the legislature's website
and streaming platform;

(iii) Include security measures that, to the
greatest extent reasonably practical, assure that all votes
recorded as cast by a legislator through the electronic
voting system were entered by that legislator and not by
any other person;

(iv) Include the capacity to perform other
functions. This paragraph shall be applicable only if the
HB0158

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0353
excess functionality required by this paragraph can be
provided without exceeding the appropriation provided by
this act;

(v) Be developed under the direction of the
legislative service office and shall integrate with the
software systems currently used by the Wyoming legislature.

(b) The funds appropriated in subsection (a) of this
section shall not be transferred or expended for any
purpose other than for the planning, design, purchase and
installation of the electronic voting system required by
subsection (a) of this section. Any unexpended,
unobligated amount remaining from funds appropriated under
this act shall revert on June 30, 2026. The amounts
appropriated in subsection (a) of this section are intended
to provide a maximum amount for the electronic voting
system provided by this act and shall not be construed to
be an entitlement or guaranteed amount.

HB0158

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0353
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0158